Utah statutes.
47-1-3.   Evidence -- Dismissal of action -- Costs.
In such action evidence of the general reputation of the place shall be
admissible for the purpose of proving the existence of the nuisance. If the
complaint is filed by a citizen, it shall not be dismissed except upon a sworn
statement made by the relator and his attorney setting forth the reasons why
the action should be dismissed, and the dismissal approved by the county
attorney in writing or in open court. If the court is of the opinion that the
action ought not to be dismissed, it may direct the county attorney to
prosecute the action to judgment, and, if the action is continued for more
than one term of court, any citizen of the county or the county attorney may
be substituted for the relator and prosecute the action to judgment. If the
action is brought by a citizen and the court finds there was no reasonable
ground or cause therefor, the costs may be taxed to such citizen.
